test/src/morphology/A-tuuli_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - tūļi: # adjectives 199 'eng /est tuulne/fin' - full paradigm
     tūļi+A+Sg+Nom: tūļi
     tūļi+A+Sg+Gen: tūļiz
     tūļi+A+Sg+Par: tūļizt
     tūļi+A+Sg+Dat: tūļizõn
     tūļi+A+Sg+Ins: tūļizõks
     tūļi+A+Sg+Ill: tūļizõ
     tūļi+A+Sg+Ela: tūļizõst
     tūļi+A+Pl+Nom: tūļizt
     tūļi+A+Pl+Gen: tūļizt
     tūļi+A+Pl+Par: tūļiži
     tūļi+A+Pl+Dat: tūļiztõn
     tūļi+A+Pl+Ins: tūļiztõks
     tūļi+A+Pl+Ill: tūļižiz
     tūļi+A+Pl+Ela: tūļižist
